Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1314
Agency order; appeal.

An order of the agency which has become final may be appealed in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 11.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.